Maine, session 132, LD1486.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA c. 201, sub-c. 10-B is enacted to read:
SUBCHAPTER 10-B
FIRST-GENERATION HOMEOWNER DOWN PAYMENT ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM
§4947. First-generation Homeowner Down Payment Assistance Program
1. Program established. The First-generation Homeowner Down Payment
Assistance Program, referred to in this subchapter as "the program," is established within
the Maine State Housing Authority.
2. Purpose. The purpose of the program is to provide down payment assistance in the
form of a loan to first-generation homeowners.
3. Program requirements. The program must be administered subject to the
provisions of this section. Priority must be given to applicants who demonstrate a need for
assistance and an ability to repay a loan for down payment assistance issued under the
program.
A. A loan issued under the program may not exceed 10% of the purchase price of the
home that will serve as a borrower's primary residence and is limited to a borrower
who:
(1) Has a household income at or below 100% of the area median income where
the property intended for purchase is located;
(2) Has never owned a home or who owned a home but lost it due to foreclosure;
(3) Is preapproved for a first mortgage loan to purchase the property; and
(4) Has or had a parent or legal guardian who never owned a home or who owned
a home but lost it due to foreclosure.
B. A loan issued under this program is forgivable at a rate of 20% per year.
C. Administrative costs may not exceed $3,200 per loan.
4. Rules. The Maine State Housing Authority shall adopt rules to carry out the
purposes of this subchapter. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical
rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
§4948. First-generation Homeowner Down Payment Assistance Fund
1. Fund established. The First-generation Homeowner Down Payment Assistance
Fund, referred to in this subchapter as "the fund," is established under the jurisdiction of
the Maine State Housing Authority.
2. Sources of fund. The following must be paid into the fund:
A. All funds appropriated to the fund;
B. Subject to any pledge, contract or other obligation, any funds that the Maine State
Housing Authority receives in repayment of loans or advances from the fund;
Page 1 - 132LR2384(01)

C. Subject to any pledge, contract or other obligation, all interest, dividends or other
income from investment of the fund; and
D. Any other funds, including federal funds, deposited in the fund to implement the
provisions of this subchapter.
3. Revolving fund. The fund is a nonlapsing, revolving fund. All funds in the fund
must be continuously applied by the Maine State Housing Authority to carry out this
subchapter.
Sec. 2. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HOUSING AUTHORITY, MAINE STATE
First-generation Homeowner Down Payment Assistance Fund N519
Initiative: Provides ongoing funds to provide down payment assistance in the form of loans
to eligible first-generation homeowners.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $10,000,000 $10,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $10,000,000 $10,000,000